Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-628.11
Benefits; disqualification; multiple disqualifications for prohibited acts by employee.

An individual shall be disqualified for benefits for any week of unemployment benefits or for waiting week credit if he or she has been disqualified from the receipt of benefits pursuant to section 48-663.01 two or more times in the five-year period immediately prior to filing his or her most recent claim. This section shall not apply if the individual has repaid in full all overpayments established in conjunction with the disqualifications assessed under section 48-663.01 during that five-year period.

Laws 2017, LB172, § 41.